Hawaii, session 2026, SB3232.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II, subpart C, to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A- Universal school meals special fund; established.  There is established within the state treasury a special fund to be known as the universal school meals special fund, into which shall be deposited all medicaid reimbursements received by the department, and any other moneys received by the department in the form of grants and donations for universal school meals.  The special fund shall be administered by the department and used to fund universal school meals." SECTION 2.  Section 302A-405, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b) All moneys received by or for the public school cafeterias from the sale of meals, the sale of services, the federal government[,] except for medicaid reimbursements received by the department under section 302A-   , or any other source, shall be deposited in one special school lunch fund. Except as otherwise provided by the legislature, all expenditures for the operation of public school cafeterias shall be made from this fund." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________